District of Columbia statutes.
42-1903.17

Statute of limitations for warranties.

A judicial proceeding for breach of any warranty that arises under § 42-1903.16 shall be commenced within 5 years after the date the warranty period began.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title III, § 317
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-233, § 2(kk), 38 DCR 261
Mar. 20, 1992, D.C. Law 9-82, § 2(m), 39 DCR 683

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1857.